Georgia statutes. TITLE 21 Elections
PART 3 Nomination and Qualification of Independent Candidates, Candidates of Political Bodies, and Presidential Electors

21-2-170.
Nomination of candidates by petition; form of petition; signatures; limitations as to circulation and amendment of petitions; listing of such candidates on ballots; charter or ordinance authorization.

In addition to the party nominations made at primaries, nominations of candidates for public office other than municipal office may be made by nomination petitions signed by electors and filed in the manner provided in this Code section, and such nomination by petition may also be made for municipal public office if provided for by the municipality’s charter or by municipal ordinance. Such petition shall be in the form prescribed by the officers with whom they are filed, and no forms other than the ones so prescribed shall be used for such purposes, but such petitions shall provide sufficient space for the printing of the elector’s name as well as for his or her signature. In addition to the other requirements provided for in this Code section, each elector signing a nomination petition shall also print his or her name thereon.

A nomination petition of a candidate seeking an office which is voted upon state wide shall be signed by a number of voters equal to 1 percent of the total number of registered voters eligible to vote in the last election for the filling of the office the candidate is seeking and the signers of such petition shall be registered and eligible to vote in the election at which such candidate seeks to be elected. A nomination petition of a candidate for any other office shall be signed by a number of voters equal to 5 percent of the total number of registered voters eligible to vote in the last election for the filling of the office the candidate is seeking and the signers of such petition shall be registered and eligible to vote in the election at which such candidate seeks to be elected. However, in the case of a candidate seeking an office for which there has never been an election or seeking an office in a newly constituted constituency, the percentage figure shall be computed on the total number of registered voters in the constituency who would have been qualified to vote for such office had the election been held at the last general election and the signers of such petition shall be registered and eligible to vote in the election at which such candidate seeks to be elected.

Each person signing a nomination petition shall declare therein that he or she is a duly qualified and registered elector of the state, county, or municipality entitled to vote in the next election for the filling of the office sought by the candidate supported by the petition and shall add to his or her signature his or her residence address, giving municipality, if any, and county, with street and number, if any, and be urged to add the person’s date of birth which shall be used for verification purposes. No person shall sign the same petition more than once. Each petition shall support the candidacy of only a single candidate, except any political body seeking to have the names of its candidates for the offices of presidential electors placed upon the ballot through nomination petitions shall not compile a separate petition for each candidate for such office, but such political body shall compile its petitions so that the entire slate of candidates of such body for such office shall be listed together on the same petition. A signature shall be stricken from the petition when the signer so requests prior to the presentation of the petition to the appropriate officer for filing, but such a request shall be disregarded if made after such presentation.

A nomination petition shall be on one or more sheets of uniform size and different sheets must be used by signers resident in different counties or municipalities. The upper portion of each sheet, prior to being signed by any petitioner, shall bear the name and title of the officer with whom the petition will be filed, the name of the candidate to be supported by the petition, his or her profession, business, or occupation, if any, his or her place of residence with street and number, if any, the name of the office he or she is seeking, his or her political body affiliation, if any, and the name and date of the election in which the candidate is seeking election. If more than one sheet is used, they shall be bound together when offered for filing if they are intended to constitute one nomination petition, and each sheet shall be numbered consecutively, beginning with number one, at the foot of each page. Each sheet shall bear on the bottom or back thereof the affidavit of the circulator of such sheet, which affidavit must be subscribed and sworn to by such circulator before a notary public and shall set forth:

His or her residence address, giving municipality with street and number, if any;

That each signer manually signed his or her own name with full knowledge of the contents of the nomination petition;

That each signature on such sheet was signed within 180 days of the last day on which such petition may be filed; and

That, to the best of the affiant’s knowledge and belief, the signers are registered electors of the state qualified to sign the petition, that their respective residences are correctly stated in the petition, and that they all reside in the county or municipality named in the affidavit.

No notary public may sign the petition as an elector or serve as a circulator of any petition which he or she notarized. Any and all sheets of a petition that have the circulator’s affidavit notarized by a notary public who also served as a circulator of one or more sheets of the petition or who signed one of the sheets of the petition as an elector shall be disqualified and rejected.

No nomination petition shall be circulated prior to 180 days before the last day on which such petition may be filed, and no signature shall be counted unless it was signed within 180 days of the last day for filing the same.

A nomination petition shall not be amended or supplemented after its presentation to the appropriate officer for filing.

Only those candidates whose petitions are accompanied by a certificate sworn to by the chairperson and secretary of a political body duly registered with the Secretary of State as required by Code Section 21-2-110, stating that the named candidate is the nominee of that political body by virtue of being nominated in a convention, as prescribed in Code Section 21-2-172, shall be listed on the ballot under the name of the political body. All petition candidates not so designated as the nominee of a political body shall be listed on the ballot in the independent column.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this Code section, candidates for municipal offices may be nominated by petitions as provided for in this Code section only if the municipality authorizes such nominations by petitions in its charter or by ordinance.

History.

Ga. L. 1922, p. 97, § 3; Code 1933, § 34-1904; Ga. L. 1943, p. 292, § 1; Ga. L. 1962, p. 618, § 1; Code 1933, § 34-1010, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 257, § 1; Ga. L. 1968, p. 871, § 7; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1974, p. 4, § 3; Ga. L. 1975, p. 861, § 1; Ga. L. 1979, p. 616, § 1; Ga. L. 1983, p. 140, § 1; Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 3; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1990, p. 243, § 4; Ga. L. 1991, p. 133, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 1999, p. 23, § 2; Ga. L. 2001, p. 240, § 12.

21-2-171.
Examination of petitions; basis for grant or denial of filing; review and appeal of denial.

When any nomination petition is presented in the office of the Secretary of State or of any superintendent for filing within the period limited by this chapter, it shall be the duty of such officer to examine the same to the extent necessary to determine if it complies with the law. No candidate shall be qualified if such nomination petition:

Contains material errors or defects apparent on the face thereof;

Contains material alterations made after signing without the consent of the signers; or

Does not contain a sufficient number of signatures of registered voters as required by law.

The Secretary of State or any superintendent shall review the petition for compliance with the provisions of Code Section 21-2-170 and shall disregard any pages or signatures that are not in conformance with the provisions of that Code section. The Secretary of State or any superintendent may question the genuineness of any signature appearing on a petition or the qualification of any signer whose signature appears thereon and, if he or she shall thereupon find that any such signature is improper, such signature shall be disregarded in determining whether the petition contains a sufficient number of signatures as required by law. The invalidity of any sheet of a nomination petition shall not affect the validity of such petition if a sufficient petition remains after eliminating such invalid sheet.

Upon the filing of a nomination petition, the officer with whom it is filed shall begin expeditiously to examine the petition to determine if it complies with the law. During such examination the officer shall have the right to summon by subpoena on two days’ notice and interrogate under oath the candidate named in the petition, any person who signed the petition, any person who executed or witnessed any affidavit or certificate accompanying the petition, or any other person who may have knowledge of any matter relevant to the examination. Such officer shall also have the right to subpoena on two days’ notice any record relevant to the examination. No witness shall be compelled to attend if he or she should reside more than 100 miles from the place of hearing by the nearest practical route; provided, however, that the officer may compel the taking of his or her testimony by deposition in the county of the residence of the witness. The sheriff of any county, or his or her deputy, or agent of the officer shall serve all processes issued by the officer, or the same may be served by United States registered or certified mail or statutory overnight delivery; and the production of an appropriate return receipt issued by the United States post office or commercial delivery firm shall constitute prima-facie evidence of such service. In case of the refusal of any person subpoenaed to attend or testify, such fact shall be reported forthwith by the officer to the appropriate superior court, or to a judge thereof, and such court or judge shall order such witness to attend and testify; and, on failure or refusal to obey such order, such witness shall be dealt with as for contempt. Any witness so subpoenaed, and after attending, shall be allowed and paid the same mileage and fee as now allowed and paid witnesses in civil actions in the superior court. The officer shall not be bound by technical rules of evidence in hearing such testimony. The testimony presented shall be stenographically recorded and made a part of the record of the examination. If the petition complies with the law, it shall be granted and the candidate named therein shall be notified in writing. If the petition fails to comply with the law, it shall be denied and the candidate named therein shall be notified of the cause for such denial by letter directed to his or her last known address. In neither case shall the petition be returned to the candidate.

The decision of the officer denying a nomination petition may be reviewed by the superior court of the county containing the office of such officer upon an application for a writ of mandamus to compel the granting of such petition. The application for such writ of mandamus shall be made within five days of the time when the petitioner is notified of such decision. Upon the application being made, a judge of such court shall fix a time and place for hearing the matter in dispute as soon as practicable; and notice thereof shall be served with a copy of such application upon the officer with whom the nomination petition was filed and upon the petitioner. At the time so fixed the court, or any judge thereof assigned for the purpose, shall hear the case. If after such hearing the said court shall find that the decision of the officer was erroneous, it shall issue its mandate to the officer to correct his or her decision and to grant the nomination petition. From any decision of the superior court an appeal may be taken within five days after the entry thereof. It shall be the duty of the appellate court to fix the hearing and to announce its decision within such period of time as will permit the name of the candidate affected by the court’s decision to be printed on the ballot if the court should so determine.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1011, enacted by Ga. L. 1964, Ex. Sess., p. 26, § 1; Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1997, p. 590, § 14; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 3; Ga. L. 2001, p. 20, § 1; Ga. L. 2010, p. 914, § 6/HB 540; Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 3-6/HB 927.

Cross references.

Witness fees and mileage, §

24-13-25

.

Editor’s notes.

Ga. L. 2000, p. 1589, § 16, not codified by the General Assembly, made the Act applicable with respect to notices delivered on or after July 1, 2000.

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 1-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “This Act shall be known and may be cited as the ‘Appellate Jurisdiction Reform Act of 2016.’ ”

Ga. L. 2016, p. 883, § 6-1/HB 927, not codified by the General Assembly, provides that: “Part III of this Act shall become effective on January 1, 2017, and shall apply to cases in which a notice of appeal or application to appeal is filed on or after such date.”

Law reviews.

For article on the 2016 amendment of this Code section, see 33 Georgia St. U. L. Rev. 205 (2016).

21-2-172.
Nomination of presidential electors and candidates of political bodies by convention.

Any political party desiring to nominate its presidential electors by convention, any political body desiring to nominate its candidates qualifying with petitions by convention, and any political body desiring to nominate its candidates for state-wide public office by convention by virtue of qualifying under Code Section 21-2-180 shall, through its state executive committee, adopt rules and regulations in conformity with this Code section governing the holding of such conventions for the nomination of candidates for any state, district, or county office. Such rules and regulations shall be filed with the Secretary of State, and no amendment to such rules and regulations shall be effective unless filed with the Secretary of State at least 30 days prior to the date of such convention. The state party or body chairperson of such political party or body and its secretary shall accompany the filing of such rules and regulations with their certificate certifying that the rules and regulations therein filed are a true and correct copy of the rules and regulations of the party pertaining to the nomination of candidates by the convention method.

The Secretary of State shall examine all such rules and all amendments thereto as shall be filed with him or her within 15 days after receipt thereof. If, in the opinion of the Secretary of State, any rule or regulation, or any part thereof, does not meet the requirements prescribed by this Code section, he or she shall notify the state party or body chairperson and secretary of such party or body in writing, stating therein his or her reasons for rejecting such rule or regulation. If, in the judgment of the Secretary of State, such rules and regulations meet the requirements prescribed by this Code section, they shall be approved.

The Secretary of State shall not approve any such rules or regulations unless they provide:

That a notice of the proposed date for the holding of any such convention must be published in a newspaper having a general circulation within the area to be affected at least ten days prior to the date of any such convention. Such notice shall also state the purpose for which the convention has been called;

That delegates to the convention shall be certified pursuant to appropriate party or body rules by the proper party or body officials;

That delegates to the convention shall be apportioned in such manner as will properly reflect the number of electors residing within the political subdivisions or areas affected in accordance with the last United States decennial census, or apportioned according to the number of votes received by the party’s candidate for the office of President of the United States in the last presidential election in the areas concerned, or apportioned according to the number of votes received by the party’s candidate for the office of Governor of Georgia in the last gubernatorial election in the areas concerned;

In the event that more than one county is involved, each county shall have at least one delegate to the convention, and such additional delegates as shall be allotted thereto shall be apportioned according to paragraph (3) of this subsection; and

That a certified copy of the minutes of the convention, attested to by the chairperson and secretary of the convention, must be filed by the nominee with his or her nomination petition.

Any candidate nominated by convention shall be required to pay to the person with whom he or she files his or her notice of candidacy the same qualifying fee or the same pauper’s affidavit and qualifying petition as that required of other candidates for the same office.

A convention for the purpose of nominating candidates shall be held at least 150 days prior to the date on which the general election is conducted.

Nothing contained within this Code section shall be construed so as to apply to the nomination of substitute candidates by convention pursuant to Code Section 21-2-134 or to the nomination of candidates in special elections.

History.

Code 1933, § 34-1012, enacted by Ga. L. 1970, p. 347, § 13; Ga. L. 1986, p. 890, § 4; Ga. L. 1987, p. 34, § 1; Ga. L. 1987, p. 647, § 3; Ga. L. 1989, p. 643, § 7; Ga. L. 1990, p. 53, § 1; Ga. L. 1998, p. 295, § 1; Ga. L. 2001, Ex. Sess., p. 325, § 8; Ga. L. 2014, p. 1, § 4/HB 310; Ga. L. 2019, p. 7, § 4/HB 316.

The 2019 amendment,

effective April 2, 2019, substituted “nomination petition” for “notice of candidacy” at the end of paragraph (c)(5).

Law reviews.

For article on the 2014 amendment of this Code section, see 31 Ga. St. U. L. Rev. 93 (2014).

For article on the 2019 amendment of this Code section, see 36 Ga. St. U.L. Rev. 81 (2019).